Virginia statutes. Title 25.1. Eminent Domain.
Article 4. Determination of Just Compensation by Commissioners.

§§ 25.1-226,
25.1-227.
Repealed by Acts 2006, c. 586, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current similar provisions, see §§

25.1-227.1

and

25.1-227.2

.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

25.1-226

and 25.1-227, which specified requirements for qualification of commissioners and procedures for empanelment of commissioners, were derived from Code 1919, §§ 4366, 4367; 1928, p. 334; 1948, p. 168; Code 1950, §§ 25-12, 25-16; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.20; 1968, c. 535; 1973, c. 510; 1974, c. 625; 1975, c. 551; 1991, c. 520; 1993, c. 906; 1997, c. 58; 2000, c. 1029; 2003, c. 940.

§ 25.1-227.1.
Qualifications of commissioners.

The provisions of this article shall apply in eminent domain proceedings in which the issue of just compensation is to be determined by a commission.

All commissioners shall be disinterested freeholders and residents of the county or city wherein the property or the greater portion of the property to be condemned is situated. No person shall serve as a commissioner for more than one full week within any three-month period, unless agreed to by the parties.

History.

2010, c. 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 835, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to actions filed on or after July 1, 2010.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 50, 72, 73, 74, 80.

§ 25.1-227.2.
Empanelment of commissioners.

The parties to the eminent domain proceeding may agree upon five or nine persons qualified to act as commissioners, as provided in subsection B of §

25.1-227.1

.

If the parties cannot agree upon five or nine qualified persons to act as commissioners, then each party shall present to the court a list containing the names of at least eight qualified persons. If any party fails to submit such a list of names, the court may, in its discretion, submit such a list on such party’s behalf.

From the lists submitted pursuant to subsection B, the court shall select the names of thirteen potential commissioners and at least two alternates. At least 30 days prior to their service, such persons shall be summoned to appear.

If nine qualified persons are selected, the petitioner and the owners shall each have two peremptory challenges and the remaining five shall serve as commissioners. If five qualified persons are agreed upon as provided in subsection A, they shall serve as commissioners.

If an owner has filed no answer to the petition, and the court finds that the owner is not represented by counsel, the court may, in its discretion, and subject to the right of the petitioner to challenge for cause, subpoena five persons who shall serve as commissioners.

Any three or more of the five commissioners may act.

In condemnation proceedings instituted by the Commissioner of Highways, a person owning structures or improvements for which an outdoor advertising permit has been issued by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to §

33.2-1208

shall be deemed to be an “owner” for purposes of this section.

History.

2010, c. 835; 2016, c. 265; 2018, c. 158.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 835, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to actions filed on or after July 1, 2010.”

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’ to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 265 substituted “30 days” for “one week” in subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 158, in subsection B, substituted “eight qualified persons” for “six qualified persons”; and in subsection C, substituted “thirteen potential commissioners” for “nine potential commissioners.”